Arkansas, session 2025, HB1832.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. (a) The General
Assembly finds:
(1)(A) Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 80, § 9, provides that
any rules promulgated by the Supreme Court under Arkansas Constitution,
Amendment 80, §§ 5, 6(B), 7(B), or 8, may be annulled or amended, in whole or
in part, by a two-thirds vote of the membership of each house of the General
Assembly.
(B) Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 80, § 5, concerns the
Court of Appeals.
*MBM197*
04-07-2025 10:36:14 MBM197

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 HB1832
(C) Rule 1-2 of the Rules of the Supreme Court and Court
of Appeals of the State of Arkansas addresses the jurisdiction of the Court
of Appeals; and
(2) Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 80, § 10, provides that the
General Assembly shall have the power to establish jurisdiction of all courts
and venue of all actions therein, unless otherwise provided in the Arkansas
Constitution.
(b) The purpose of this act is to establish the:
(1) Exclusive original jurisdiction of the Court of Appeals
under the authority of Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 80, § 9, pertaining
to facial constitutional challenges; and
(2) Exclusive original jurisdiction of the Court of Appeals
under Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 80, § 10, pertaining to facial
constitutional challenges.

SECTION 2. Pursuant to the authority granted under Arkansas
Constitution, Amendment 80, § 9, Rule 1-2 of the Rules of the Supreme Court
and Court of Appeals of the State of Arkansas is amended to read as follows:
Rule 1-2. Appellate Jurisdiction of the Supreme Court and Court of
Appeals.
(a) Original jurisdiction of Court of Appeals for facial
constitutional challenges. The Court of Appeals shall have exclusive
original jurisdiction over a facial constitutional challenge in which a party
seeks in the party's initial or amended pleading to have a provision of an
act of the General Assembly, a provision of the Arkansas Code, or a provision
of an administrative rule or regulation declared unconstitutional in all of
its applications under the United States Constitution or the Arkansas
Constitution. In a proceeding under this Rule 1-2(a), the procedure will
conform to that prevailing in bench trials in the circuit court. Upon filing
the original pleading and payment of a filing fee, a summons or other process
will issue by the Clerk. The respondent's pleading must be filed within the
time provided by the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure. The decision of the
Court of Appeals under this Rule 1-2(a) may be appealed to the Supreme Court.
(a)(b) Supreme Court jurisdiction. All cases appealed shall be filed
in the Court of Appeals except that the following cases shall be filed in the
Supreme Court:
04-07-2025 10:36:14 MBM197

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 HB1832
1. All appeals involving the interpretation or construction of
the Constitution of Arkansas;
2. Criminal appeals in which the death penalty or life
imprisonment has been imposed;
3. Petitions for quo warranto, prohibition, injunction, or
mandamus directed to the state, county, or municipal officials or to circuit
courts;
4. Appeals pertaining to elections and election procedures;
5. Appeals involving the discipline of attorneys-at-law and or
arising under the power of the Supreme Court to regulate the practice of law;
6. Appeals involving the discipline and disability of judges;
7. Second or subsequent appeals following an appeal which has
been decided in the Supreme Court; and
8. Appeals required by law to be heard by the Supreme Court.
(b)(c) Reassignment of cases. Any case is subject to reassignment by
the Supreme Court, and in doing so, the Supreme Court will consider but not
be limited to the following:
(1) issues of first impression,
(2) issues upon which there is a perceived inconsistency in the
decisions of the Court of Appeals or Supreme Court,
(3) issues involving federal constitutional interpretation,
(4) issues of substantial public interest,
(5) significant issues needing clarification or development of
the law, or overruling of precedent, and
(6) appeals involving substantial questions of law concerning
the validity, construction, or interpretation of an act of the General
Assembly, ordinance of a municipality or county, or a rule or regulation of
any court, administrative agency, or regulatory body.
(c)(d) Transfer and certification. The Supreme Court may transfer to
the Court of Appeals any case appealed to the Supreme Court and may transfer
to the Supreme Court any case appealed to the Court of Appeals. If the Court
of Appeals seeks to transfer a case, the Court of Appeals shall find and
certify that the case: (1) is excepted from its jurisdiction by Rule 1-
2(a)(b), or (2) otherwise involves an issue of significant public interest or
a legal principle of major importance. The Supreme Court may accept for its
docket cases so certified or may remand any of them to the Court of Appeals
04-07-2025 10:36:14 MBM197

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 HB1832
for decision. The Clerk of the Court shall notify the parties or their
counsel of the transfer of any case.
(d)(e) Petition for review. No Except as provided in Rule 1-2(a), no
appeal as of right shall lie from the Court of Appeals to the Supreme Court.
The Supreme Court will exercise its discretion to review an appeal decided by
the Court of Appeals only on application by a party to the appeal, upon
certification of the Court of Appeals, or if the Supreme Court decides the
case is one that should have originally been assigned to the Supreme Court.
In determining whether to grant a petition to review, the following, while
neither controlling nor fully measuring the Supreme Court's discretion,
indicate the character of reasons that will be considered: (i) the case was
decided in the Court of Appeals by a tie vote, (ii) the Court of Appeals
rendered a decision which is arguably in conflict with a prior holding of a
published opinion of either the Supreme Court or the Court of Appeals, or
(iii) the Court of Appeals arguably erred in some way related to one of the
grounds listed in Rule 1-2(b)(c).
(e)(f) Improper filing. No case filed in either the Supreme Court or
the Court of Appeals shall be dismissed for having been filed in the wrong
court but shall be transferred or certified to the proper court.
(f)(g) Allocation of workload. Notwithstanding the foregoing
provisions, cases may be assigned and transferred between the courts by
Supreme Court order to achieve a fair allocation of the appellate workload
between the Supreme Court and the Court of Appeals.
(g)(h) In all appeals from criminal convictions or post-conviction
relief matters heard in the Court of Appeals, the appellant shall not be
required to petition for rehearing in the Court of Appeals or review in the
Supreme Court following an adverse decision of the Court of Appeals in order
to be deemed to have exhausted all available state remedies respecting a
claim of error. When the claim has been presented to the Court of Appeals or
the Supreme Court, and relief has been denied, the appellant shall be deemed
to have exhausted all available state remedies.

SECTION 3. Pursuant to the authority granted under Arkansas
Constitution, Amendment 80, § 9, Rule 2-4(b) of the Rules of the Supreme
Court and Court of Appeals of the State of Arkansas, concerning the contents
of a petition, is amended to read as follows:
04-07-2025 10:36:14 MBM197

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 HB1832
(b) Contents of petition. A petition to the Supreme Court for review
of a decision of the Court of Appeals shall not exceed three 8 1/2 x 11",
double-spaced pages in length. The petition must briefly and distinctly
state the basis upon which the case should be reviewed and may include
citations of authority or references to statutes or constitutional
provisions. The petition can only be filed by a party to the appeal and is
otherwise subject to Rule 1-2(e)(f).

SECTION 4. Pursuant to the authority granted under Arkansas
Constitution, Amendment 80, § 9, Rule 2-4(d) of the Rules of the Supreme
Court and Court of Appeals of the State of Arkansas, concerning grounds for
review, is amended to read as follows:
(d) Grounds for review. A petition for review must allege one of the
following: (i) the case was decided in the Court of Appeals by a tie vote,
(ii) the Court of Appeals rendered a decision which is in conflict with a
prior holding of a published opinion of either the Supreme Court or the Court
of Appeals, or (iii) the Court of Appeals otherwise erred with respect to one
of the grounds listed in Rules 1-2(b)(c).

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 16-13-201(a), concerning the jurisdiction
of circuit courts, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) Circuit Except as provided in subdivision (a)(2) of this
section, circuit courts shall have original jurisdiction of all justiciable
matters not otherwise assigned pursuant to the Arkansas Constitution.
(2) The Court of Appeals shall have exclusive original
jurisdiction over a facial constitutional challenge in which a party seeks in
the party's initial or amended pleading to have a provision of an act of the
General Assembly, a provision of the Arkansas Code, or a provision of an
administrative rule or regulation declared unconstitutional in all of its
applications under the United States Constitution or the Arkansas
Constitution.

SECTION 6. EFFECTIVE DATE. This act shall be effective on and after
November 1, 2025.

/s/M. Shepherd
04-07-2025 10:36:14 MBM197